src-fst-morphology-root.lexc.md
# Multichar\_Symbols and *Root* lexicon for Komi

Check these:

## Analysis symbols
* **+WORK** to mark intermediate solutions

The morphological analyses of wordforms for the Komi-Zyrian
language are presented in this system in terms of the following symbols.
(It is highly suggeste   d to follow existing standards when adding new tags).

### The parts-of-speech tags
* **+A**:  adjective  кывберд   прилагательное
* **+Adp**:  adposition (prepositio, postposition)     
* **+Adv**:  adverb    урчитан            наречие
* **+CS**:  subordinating conjunction      XX   подчинительный союз
* **+CC**:  coordinating conjunction      XX   сочинительный союз
* **+Det**:  determiner  XX   XX
* **+Interj**:  interjection   междометтьӧ   междометие
* **+N**:  noun      эмакыв    - существительное
* **+Num**:  numeral      лыдакыв   числительное
* **+Pcle**:  particle      кывтор   частица
* **+Po**:  postposition   кывбӧр   послелог
* **+Pr**:  preposition   XX   предлог
* **+Pron**:  pronoun   нимвежтас   местоимение
* **+Qnt**:  Quantifier   ХХ   XX
* **+V**:  verb      кадакыв   глагол

### Subtags

#### Adverb subtags

* **+Ideoph** These are ideophonic descriptors used to modify the verb --  вырк ливтясь "**flit** and it flew off"
* **+Deg** Degree depricate AdA
* **+Manner** with reference to type of adverb
* **+Mult** multiplicative, i.e. iterations
* **+Spat** spatial
* **+Temp** temporal
* **+Parenthetic** parenthetical phrase
* **+Presentational** 

#### Interjections
**+Formulaic** = expressions such as аттьӧ, ало, ... 
**+Conative** Used for calling animals, for example брысь, баль-баль, ...

#### Nouns
* **+Prop** proper
* **+CollN** used with paired nouns **collective nouns**
* **+Relat** relational noun: выв, ув

####  Pronouns
* **+Dem**:  demonstrative
* **+Indef**:  indefinite
* **+Interr**:  interrogative
* **+Pers**:  personal
* **+Recipr**:  reciprocal
* **+Refl**:  reflexive
* **+Rel**:  relative
* **+Poss**:  possessive

#### Nominals are inflected for Number and Case

#### Number
* **+Sg**  singular
* **+Pl**  plural
* **+Du** for pronoun.

#### Case

A category of case in Komi can be identified as:

*  **+Acc** accusative ZERO керан
*  **+Acc1** accusative -ӧс керан
*  **+Acc3** accusative -сӧ керан
*  **+Abl** ablative case -лысь босьтан
*  **+Apr** approximative -лань матыстчан
    - **+AprEgr** approximative egressive -ланьсянь матысь ылыстчан
    - **+AprEla** approximative elative -ланьысь матысь петан
    - **+AprIll** approximative illative -ланьӧ матӧ матыстчан
    - **+AprIne** approximative inessive -ланьын матыс ина
    - **+AprPrl** approximative prolative -ланьӧд маті вуджан
    - **+AprTer** approximative terminative -ланьӧдз матіӧдз воан
    - **+AprTra** approximative translative -ланьті маті вуджан
*  **+Car** caritive -тӧг торйӧдан
*  **+Cns** consecultative -ла могман
*  **+Com** Comitative -кӧд ӧтвывтан
*  **+Cmpr** Comparative case form -ся ӧткодялан
*  **+Cmpl**  Postposition complement
*  **+Dat** dative case -лы сетан
*  **+Egr** egressive -сянь ылыстчан
*  **+Ela** elative -ысь петан
*  **+Gen** genitive case -лӧн асалан
*  **+Ill** illative -ӧ пыран
*  **+Ine** inessive -ын ина
*  **+Ins** instrumental -ӧн керанторъя
*  **+Nom** nominative case нимтан
*  **+Prl** prolative -ӧд вуджан
*  **+Tra** translative -ті вуджан
*  **+Ter** Terminative -ӧдз матыстчан
*  **+Voc** Vocative ??
*  **+Abs** Absolute = +Sg+Nom

#### Possessive suff
* **+PxSg1 +PxSg2 +PxSg3 +PxPl1 +PxPl2 +PxPl3** 
* **+Px1 +Px2 +Px3**
* **+So/CP** segment ordering: case, person
* **+So/PC** segment ordering: person, case

#### The comparative forms are:
* **+Comp** джык
* **+Superl** 

#### Numeral tags:
* **+Attr +Card** 
* **+Ord** 
* **+Iter**  Iterative form expressing number of times
* **+Tot** 
* **+Arab +Rom** 
* **+Coll** 

#### Quantifiers (numerals)

* **+Appr**:  Approximative numeral кавто-колмо, колмошка *two or three*   NB! do not confuse with Komi case +Apr
* **+AssocColl**:  -ne- ; avide-
* **+Assoc**:  +мезть
* **+Card**:  cardinal + NCard
* **+ZeroColl**:  Zero collective кодныс
* **+Distr**:  Distributive
* **+Iter: Iterative form expressing number of consecutive times; kpv**:  `кыкысь`
* **+Mult: Multiplicative adverbs number of times; kpv**:  `кык пӧв`
* **+Coord**:  Coordinates, i.e. 65˚36′8,30″ in numerals.lexc
* **+Cop**:  this is for copula complement predicate position with pl in -ӧсь depricated Pred

#### Verb tags
* **+Ind +Prs +Prt1 +Prt2 +Fut +Imprt** tense
* **+Sg1 +Sg2 +Sg3 +Pl1 +Pl2 +Pl3 +Du1** person тэа-меа
* **+1 +2 +3**  Final мед ог _so that I/we won't_ 2019-04-06
* **+Inf** 
* **+Ger**  Gerund This is used with derivations
* **+ConNeg +Neg** 
* **+VAbess** тӧм Participle verbal adjective, see also Der/Abe
* **+VCar** тӧг Gerund
* **+VTer** тӧдз Gerund
* **+Final**  мог, мон, моз 'so that I won't'
* **+TV** 
* **+IV**
* **+Aux** 

#### Other tags
* **+ABBR +ACR** 
* **+Acron** 
* **+Symbol** = independent symbols in the text stream, like £, €, ©
Special symbols are classified with:
* **+CLB +PUNCT +LEFT +RIGHT +MIDDLE** 
* **+Multi** Special multiword units are analysed with:
* **+Guess** 

#### Question and Focus particles:
* **+Qst**
* **+Foc** 
* **+Clt/И**  This comes at the end of a word -и or after vowels (some authors use -й)
* **+Clt** 
* **+Qst/A** 
* **+Qst/Oe** 
* **+Clt/тӧ** 
* **+Clt/сӧ**
* **+Clt/Kodj** adjectival phrase
* **+Clt/Moz** adverbial clause

* **+Hom1** 
* **+Hom2** 
* **+Intens** 

### Tags distinguishing different versions of the same lemma (before POS)
* **+v1**
* **+v2**
* **+v3**
* **+v4**
* **+v5**
* **+v6**
* **+v7**
* **+v8**
* **+v9**
* **+v10**
* **+v11**
* **+v12**
* **+v13**
* **+v14**
* **+v15**
* **+v16**
* **+v17**
* **+v18**
* **+v19**
* **+v20**
* **+v21**
* **+v22**
* **+v23**
* **+v24**

#### Usage tags:
* **+Err/Orth** 
* **+Err/Orth-colloq** colloquial form for patronymic
* **+Err/Orth-no-paragogic-j** 
* **+Err/Orth-no-paragogic-k** 
* **+Err/Orth-no-paragogic-m** 
* **+Err/Orth-no-paragogic-t** 
* **+Err/Orth-l-in-v** followed by vowel, yet v
* **+Err/Orth-l-to-v-in-new** 
* **+Err/Orth-l-to-vowel-lengthening** 
* **+Err/Orth-l-retenstion** 

* **+Err/Dial** e.g. тэг instead of тӧг
* **+Err/Lex** substandard, not in normative fst, no  normative lemma помсьыны
* **+Use/-Spell** 
* **+Use/SpellNoSugg** 
* **+Use/PMatch** means that the following is only used in the analyser feeding the disambiguator
* **+Use/-PMatch** Do not include in fst's made for hfst-pmatch
* **+Use/NG** This is used for minimizing excess generation in apertium kpv-koi
* **+Use/GC** – **only** retained in the HFST Grammar Checker disambiguation analyser
* **+Use/-GC** – **never** retained in the HFST Grammar Checker disambiguation analyser

* +URL * For tagging URLs

#### Dialect features
* **+Dial/л** 
* **+Dial/в** 

#### Check these Where do these come from source
* **+Src/F** foreign source apparently 2015-09-08
* **+Dim** diminutive for verbs -ышт- (there might be a better term)
* **+Dimin** diminutive for nouns -тор-
* **+NonHum** look at this and place somewhere

Semantic tags to help disambiguation & synt. analysis: (before POS)
Borrowed from main/langs/sme/src/morphology/root.lexc

### Semantic tags

* **+Sem/Act** Activity
* **+Sem/Amount** Amount
* **+Sem/Ani** Animate
* **+Sem/Aniprod** Animal Product
* **+Sem/Body** Bodypart
* **+Sem/Body-abstr** siellu, vuoig?a, jierbmi
* **+Sem/Build** Building
* **+Sem/Build-part** Part of Bulding, like the closet
* **+Sem/Cat** Category
* **+Sem/Clth** Clothes
* **+Sem/Clth-jewl** Jewelery
* **+Sem/Clth-part** part of clothes, boallu, sávdnji...
* **+Sem/Ctain** Container
* **+Sem/Ctain-abstr** Abstract container like bank account
* **+Sem/Ctain-clth**
* **+Sem/Curr** Currency like dollár, Not Money
* **+Sem/Dance** Dance
* **+Sem/Dir** Direction like GPS-kursa
* **+Sem/Domain** Domain like politics, reindeerherding (a system of actions)
* **+Sem/Drink** Drink
* **+Sem/Dummytag** Dummytag
* **+Sem/Edu** Educational event
* **+Sem/Event** Event
* **+Sem/Feat** Feature, like Árvu
* **+Sem/Feat-phys** Physiological feature, ivdni, fárda
* **+Sem/Feat-psych** Psychological feauture
* **+Sem/Feat-measr** Psychological feauture
* **+Sem/Fem** Female name
* **+Sem/Food** Food
* **+Sem/Food-med** Medicine
* **+Sem/Furn** Furniture
* **+Sem/Game** Game
* **+Sem/Geom** Geometrical object
* **+Sem/Group** Animal or Human Group
* **+Sem/Hum** Human
* **+Sem/Hum-abstr** Human abstract
* **+Sem/Ideol** Ideology
* **+Sem/Lang** Language
* **+Sem/Mal** Male name
* **+Sem/Mat** Material for producing things
* **+Sem/Measr** Measure
* **+Sem/Money** Has to do with money, like wages, not Curr(ency)
* **+Sem/Obj** Object
* **+Sem/Obj-clo** Cloth
* **+Sem/Obj-cogn** Cloth
* **+Sem/Obj-el** (Electrical) machine or apparatus
* **+Sem/Obj-ling** Object with something written on it
* **+Sem/Obj-rope** flexible ropelike object
* **+Sem/Obj-surfc** Surface object
* **+Sem/Org** Organisation
* **+Sem/Part** Feature, oassi, bealli
* **+Sem/Perc-cogn** Cognative perception
* **+Sem/Perc-emo** Emotional perception
* **+Sem/Perc-phys** Physical perception
* **+Sem/Perc-psych** Physical perception
* **+Sem/Plant** Plant
* **+Sem/Plant-part** Plant part
* **+Sem/Plc** Place
* **+Sem/Plc-abstr** Abstract place
* **+Sem/Plc-elevate** Place
* **+Sem/Plc-line** Place
* **+Sem/Plc-water** Place
* **+Sem/Pos** Position (as in social position job)
* **+Sem/Process** Process
* **+Sem/Prod** Product
* **+Sem/Prod-audio** Audio product
* **+Sem/Prod-cogn** Cognition product
* **+Sem/Prod-ling** Linguistic product
* **+Sem/Prod-vis** Visual product
* **+Sem/Rel** Relation
* **+Sem/Route** Name of a Route
* **+Sem/Rule** Rule or convention
* **+Sem/Semcon** Semantic concept
* **+Sem/Sign** Sign (e.g. numbers, punctuation)
* **+Sem/Sport** Sport
* **+Sem/State**
* **+Sem/State-sick** Illness
* **+Sem/Substnc** Substance, like Air and Water
* **+Sem/Sur** Surname
* **+Sem/Symbol** Symbol
* **+Sem/Time** Time
* **+Sem/Tool** Prototypical tool for repairing things
* **+Sem/Tool-catch** Tool used for catching (e.g. fish)
* **+Sem/Tool-clean** Tool used for cleaning
* **+Sem/Tool-it** Tool used in IT
* **+Sem/Tool-measr** Tool used for measuring
* **+Sem/Tool-music** Music instrument
* **+Sem/Tool-write** Writing tool
* **+Sem/Txt** Text (girji, lávlla...)
* **+Sem/Veh** Vehicle
* **+Sem/Wpn** Weapon
* **+Sem/Wthr** The Weather or the state of ground
* **+Sem/Year**
* **+Sem/Sur-Fem** Surname female
* **+Sem/Sur-Mal** Surname male
* **+Sem/Ant**  Anthroponym
* **+Sem/Ant-Fem**  Anthroponym female
* **+Sem/Ant-Mal**  Anthroponym male
* **+Sem/Patr**  Patronym
* **+Sem/Patr-Fem**  Patronym female
* **+Sem/Patr-Mal**  Patronym male

#### Multiple Semantic tags:
* **+Sem/Ant_Fem** 
* **+Sem/Ant_Mal** 
* **+Sem/Patr-Маl** 
* **+Sem/Event_Plc**  сёянін
* **+Sem/Hum_Prof**  profession, capacity doctor, tractor driver 

### Derivation

Derivations are classified under the morphophonetic form of the suffix, the
source and target part-of-speech.

#### Dertags
